North Carolina, session 2025, SB631.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Public Safety, Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, the
sum of ten million four hundred thousand dollars ($10,400,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of fourteen million one hundred thousand dollars
($14,100,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated for employee salary
increases as awarded by Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 1.(b) Of the funds appropriated in subsection (a) of this section, the sum
of three million nine hundred thousand dollars ($3,900,000) shall be allocated to reduce salary
compression in connection with these increases.
SECTION 2.(a) Effective for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the following annual
salary schedules shall be in effect for Youth Counselor Technicians, Youth Services Behavioral
Specialists, and Youth Counselors in the Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency
Prevention:

Fiscal Year 2025-26
Years of Experience Youth Youth Services Youth
Counselor Behavioral Counselors
Technicians Specialists
0 $40,908 $42,254 $45,910
1 $43,771 $45,211 $48,354
2 $46,398 $47,972 $51,256
3 $48,718 $50,320 $53,818
4 $50,665 $52,333 $55,971
5 $52,186 $53,902 $57,650
6+ $53,230 $54,981 $58,803

Fiscal Year 2026-27
Years of Experience Youth Youth Services Youth
Counselor Behavioral Counselors
Technicians Specialists
0 $42,953 $44,367 $48,206
1 $45,960 $47,472 $50,772
*S631-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2 $48,718 $50,371 $53,819
3 $51,154 $52,836 $56,509
4 $53,198 $54,950 $58,770
5 $54,795 $56,597 $60,533
6+ $55,892 $57,730 $61,743

SECTION 2.(b) Effective for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the following annual
salary schedules shall be in effect for Juvenile Court Counselors in the Division of Juvenile
Justice and Delinquency Prevention:

Years of Juvenile Juvenile
Experience Court Court
Counselors Counselors

FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
0 $49,391 $51,861
1 $52,601 $55,231
2 $56,021 $58,822
3 $59,662 $62,645
4 $63,541 $66,718
5 $67,670 $71,054
6+ $72,070 $75,674

SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 631-First Edition